Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF15.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TITLE.new text end new text begin This act shall be known as the "Safe Haven In Every Local District (SHIELD) Act." new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 123B.595, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Facilities plans. (a) To qualify for revenue under this section, a school district or intermediate district, not including a charter school, must have a ten-year facility plan adopted by the school board and approved by the commissioner. The plan must include provisions for implementing a health and safety program that complies with health, safety, and environmental regulations and best practices, including indoor air quality management and remediation of lead hazards. For planning purposes, the plan must also address provisions for providing a gender-neutral single-user restroom at each school site. new text begin (b) The facilities plan for a school that receives a Safe Haven In Every Local District (SHIELD) grant must include a safe schools plan for each school site where improvements funded by the grant are made identifying the physical modifications to improve student and staff safety at the school site. A school district that does not receive a Safe Haven In Every Local District grant may include a safe schools plan as part of its long-term facilities maintenance plan. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The district must annually update the plan, submit the plan to the commissioner for approval by July 31, and indicate whether the district will issue bonds to finance the plan or levy for the costs. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end For school districts issuing bonds to finance the plan, the plan must include a debt service schedule demonstrating that the debt service revenue required to pay the principal and interest on the bonds each year will not exceed the projected long-term facilities revenue for that year. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for plans submitted to the commissioner on or after August 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SCHOOL SECURITY GRANTS.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety to issue school security grants to school districts and charter schools, in consultation with the Minnesota School Safety Center. new text end new text begin (b) A school district or charter school may apply for a grant in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. The commissioner may establish timelines for grant applications and may award grants in more than one round. Applications for the last round of grants must be received by the commissioner no later than August 1, 2025. new text end new text begin (c) The Minnesota School Safety Center must rank applicants based on the proposed plan for school security system installation and the commissioner must award grants in a manner consistent with the ranking. The grants must be awarded to schools located in all geographic regions of the state and priority must be given to facilities serving the largest number of students within that geographic region. new text end new text begin (d) The Minnesota School Safety Center must prepare a list of vendors authorized to provide the security services and products listed in this paragraph. The Minnesota School Safety Center must only include vendors that have been operating for at least two years and that have experience providing the school security services described in this paragraph. A school district or charter school must use grant money to contract with an approved vendor for implementation and installation of a comprehensive, multilayered, integrated security system, including an evaluation of a school site's current security systems, and training for school staff on using the security systems. The security systems must include a system to alert local law enforcement of an immediate security threat within each room in the school. A comprehensive, multilayered, integrated security system must include as many of the following components that an authorized vendor determines may be installed: new text end new text begin (1) bullet-resistant interior doors and windows; new text end new text begin (2) ballistic wall panels; new text end new text begin (3) magnetic door-locking systems; new text end new text begin (4) remote lock-down activation systems; new text end new text begin (5) a mass notification system unified with an emergency communication system; new text end new text begin (6) an emergency building access system for first responders including fire, emergency medical services, and law enforcement personnel; new text end new text begin (7) an access control system with remote door-release capabilities; new text end new text begin (8) electronic access controls for main distribution frame and independent distribution frame rooms with a key override; new text end new text begin (9) classroom duress alarms linked to a law enforcement and administration notification system; new text end new text begin (10) security system training for staff to initiate emergency protocols; new text end new text begin (11) ballistic security glass for interior door vision panels and sidelites; new text end new text begin (12) electronic access control systems for primary building entrances; and new text end new text begin (13) classroom door installations that optimize safety and security. new text end new text begin (e) The Minnesota School Safety Center must identify vendors that provide the services and systems required under paragraph (d) and provide districts and charter schools with a list of approved vendors. new text end new text begin (f) The Department of Public Safety may retain up to 2.5 percent of the appropriation to administer the grant, including for the Minnesota School Safety Center to provide districts and charter schools with technical assistance. new text end new text begin (g) By February 1 following each year a grant is awarded under this section, the Minnesota School Safety Center must report to the commissioner of public safety on the number and amount of grant awards, a description of each grant recipient's purchased items and the vendors contracted for school security system installation and technical assistance, and considerations for future school security grant funding, management, and installation. Within two weeks of receiving a report from the Minnesota School Safety Center, the commissioner of public safety must provide the report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education policy and finance, and public safety policy and finance. new text end new text begin (h) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end